Washington statutes.
RCW 36.110.120

Free venture industries, tax reduction industries—Employment status of inmates—Insurance coverage.

(1) A jail inmate who works in a free venture industry or a tax reduction industry shall be considered an employee of that industry only for the purpose of the Washington industrial safety and health act, chapter 49.17 RCW, as long as the public safety is not compromised, and for eligibility for industrial insurance benefits under Title 51 RCW, as provided in this section.

(2) For jail inmates participating in free venture employer model industries, the private sector business or industry or the nonprofit organization that is party to the agreement, shall provide industrial insurance coverage under Title 51 RCW. Local jurisdictions shall not be responsible for obligations under Title 51 RCW in a free venture employer model industry except as provided in RCW 36.110.130.

(3) For jail inmates participating in free venture customer model industries, the incarcerating entity or jurisdiction, the private sector business or industry, or the nonprofit organization that is party to the agreement, shall provide industrial insurance coverage under Title 51 RCW dependent upon how the parties to the agreement choose to finalize the agreement.

(4) For jail inmates incarcerated and participating in tax reduction industries:

(a) Local jurisdictions that are self-insured may elect to provide medical aid benefits coverage only under chapter 51.36 RCW through the state fund.

(b) Local jurisdictions, to include self-insured jurisdictions, may elect to provide industrial insurance coverage under Title 51 RCW through the state fund.

(5) If industrial insurance coverage under Title 51 RCW is provided for inmates under this section, eligibility for benefits for either the inmate or the inmate's dependents or beneficiaries for temporary total disability or permanent total disability under RCW 51.32.090 or 51.32.060, respectively, shall not take effect until the inmate is discharged from custody by order of a court of appropriate jurisdiction. Nothing in this section shall be construed to confer eligibility for any industrial insurance benefits to any jail inmate who is not employed in a free venture industry or a tax reduction industry.

[ 1995 c 154 s 2; 1993 c 285 s 12.]